Utah statutes.
62A-3-302.   Purpose of Adult Protective Services Program.
Subject to the rules made by the division under Section 62A-3-106.5, Adult
Protective Services:
(1)  shall investigate or cause to be investigated reports of alleged abuse,
neglect, or exploitation of vulnerable adults;
(2)  shall, where appropriate, provide short-term, limited protective services
with the permission of the affected vulnerable adult or the guardian or
conservator of the vulnerable adult; and
(3)  may make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, and develop procedures and policies relating
to:
(a)  reporting and investigating incidents of abuse, neglect, or exploitation;
and
(b)  providing protective services to the extent that funds are appropriated
by the Legislature for this purpose.
